District of Columbia statutes.
24-221.01

Educational good time.

(a)

Every person whose conduct complies with institutional rules and who demonstrates a desire for self-improvement by successfully participating in an academic or vocational program, including special education and Graduate Equivalency Diploma programs, shall earn educational good time credits of no less than 3 days a month and not more than 5 days a month.

(b)

Educational good time credits authorized by the provisions of this section shall be applied to the person’s minimum term of imprisonment to determine the date of eligibility for release on parole and to the person’s maximum term of imprisonment to determine the date when release on parole becomes mandatory.

Apr. 11, 1987, D.C. Law 6-218, § 3, 34 DCR 484
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 701, 56 DCR 7413
This section is referenced in § 24-221.01c, § 24-231.08, and § 24-403.02.
1981 Ed., § 24-429.
D.C. Law 18-88, in subsec. (a), substituted “participating in” for “completing” and deleted the second sentence which had read as follows: “These credits shall not be awarded until completion of the academic or vocational program.”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3061 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).